Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-1910
Medicare day, defined.

Medicare day
means any day of resident stay funded by medicare as the payment source and
includes a day funded under Medicare Part A, under a Medicare Advantage or
special needs plan, or under medicare hospice.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 10.